Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8082.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 12-1.3-2 and 12-1.3-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.3 entitled
"Expungement of Criminal Records" are hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.3-2. Motion for expungement.
(a) Any person who is a first offender may file a motion for the expungement of all records
and records of conviction for a felony or misdemeanor by filing a motion in the court in which the
conviction took place; provided, that no person who has been convicted of a crime of violence shall
have his or her records and records of conviction expunged; and provided, that all outstanding
court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges, and/or any other monetary
obligations have been paid, unless such amounts are reduced or waived by order of the court.
(b) Notwithstanding § 12-1.3-1(3) (“first offender”), any person who has been convicted
of more than one misdemeanor, but fewer than six (6) misdemeanors, and has not been convicted
of a felony may file a motion for the expungement of any or all of those misdemeanors by filing a
motion in the court in which the convictions took place; provided that convictions for offenses
under chapter 29 of title 12, § 31-27-2 or § 31-27-2.1 are not eligible for and may not be expunged
under this subsection.
(c) Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records
relating to a misdemeanor conviction after five (5) years from the date of the completion of his or
her sentence, except for any violation of § 31-27-2 or § 31-27-2.1, which a person may move to
expunge only after ten (10) years from the date of the completion of their sentence.

(d) Subject to subsection (a), a person may file a motion for the expungement of records
relating to a felony conviction after ten (10) years from the date of the completion of his or her
sentence.
(e) Subject to § 12-19-19(c), and without regard to subsections (a) through (c) of this
section, a person may file a motion for the expungement of records relating to a deferred sentence
upon its completion, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion.
(f) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person may file a motion for the expungement
of records relating to misdemeanor convictions after ten (10) years from the date of the completion
of their last sentence.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) through (f) of this section, a person
may file a motion for the expungement of records related to an offense that has been decriminalized
subsequent to the date of their conviction, after which the court will hold a hearing on the motion
in the court in which the original conviction took place.
12-1.3-3. Motion for expungement — Notice — Hearing — Criteria for granting.
(a) Any person filing a motion for expungement of the records of his or her conviction
pursuant to § 12-1.3-2 shall give notice of the hearing date set by the court to the department of the
attorney general and the police department that originally brought the charge against the person at
least ten (10) days prior to that date.
(b) The court, after the hearing at which all relevant testimony and information shall be
considered, may, in its discretion, order the expungement of the records of conviction of the person
filing the motion if it finds:
(1)(i) That in the five (5) years preceding the filing of the motion, if the conviction was for
a misdemeanor, or in the ten (10) years preceding the filing of the motion, if the conviction was for
a felony or for any violation of § 31-27-2 or § 31-27-2.1, the petitioner has not been convicted nor
arrested for any felony or misdemeanor; there are no criminal proceedings pending against the
person; that the person does not owe any outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines,
costs, assessments, or charges, unless such amounts are reduced or waived by order of the court;
and he or she has exhibited good moral character;
(ii) That after a hearing held under the provisions of § 12-19-19(c), the court finds that the
person has complied with all of the terms and conditions of the deferral agreement including, but
not limited to, the payment in full of any court-ordered fines, fees, costs, assessments, and
restitution to victims of crimes; there are no criminal proceedings pending against the person; and
he or she has established good moral character. Provided, that no person who has been convicted
of a crime of violence shall have their records relating to a deferred sentence expunged; or
LC005621 - Page 2 of 9

(iii) Subject only to §§ 12-1.3-2(b) and (f), that in the ten (10) years preceding the filing of
the motion, if the convictions were for multiple misdemeanors, the petitioner has not been
convicted nor arrested for any felony or misdemeanor; there are no criminal proceedings pending
against the person; and they have exhibited good moral character; and, provided that convictions
for offenses under chapter 29 of title 12, § 31-27-2 or § 31-27-2.1 are not eligible and may not be
expunged under this subsection.
(2) That the petitioner’s rehabilitation has been attained to the court’s satisfaction and the
expungement of the records of his or her conviction is consistent with the public interest.
(c) If the court grants the motion, it shall order all records and records of conviction relating
to the conviction expunged and all index and other references to it removed from public inspection.
A copy of the order of the court shall be sent to any law enforcement agency and other agency
known by either the petitioner, the department of the attorney general, or the court to have
possession of the records. Compliance with the order shall be according to the terms specified by
the court.
(d) The defendant shall be advised at the hearing that any and all bail money relating to a
case that remains on deposit and is not claimed at the time of expungement shall be escheated to
the state’s general treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.
(e) In cases of expungement sought pursuant to § 12-1.3-2(g), the court shall, after a hearing
at which it finds that all conditions of the original criminal sentence have been completed, and any
and all fines, fees, and costs related to the conviction have been paid in full, order the expungement
without cost to the petitioner. At the hearing, the court may require the petitioner to demonstrate
that the prior criminal conviction would qualify as a decriminalized offense under current law. The
demonstration may include, but is not limited to, an affidavit signed by the petitioner attesting to
the fact that the prior conviction qualifies as a decriminalized offense under current Rhode Island
law.
SECTION 2. Section 31-27-2.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-2.1. Refusal to submit to chemical test.
(a) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state shall be deemed to have
given his or her consent to chemical tests of his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine for the
purpose of determining the chemical content of his or her body fluids or breath. No more than two
(2) complete tests, one for the presence of intoxicating liquor and one for the presence of toluene
or any controlled substance, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, shall be administered at the direction of a
law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving a
LC005621 - Page 3 of 9

motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any
controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these. The director
of the department of health is empowered to make and file, with the secretary of state, regulations
that prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath
and the qualifications and certification of individuals authorized to administer the testing and
analysis.
(b) If a person, for religious or medical reasons, cannot be subjected to blood tests, the
person may file an affidavit with the division of motor vehicles stating the reasons why he or she
cannot be required to take blood tests and a notation to this effect shall be made on his or her
license. If that person is asked to submit to chemical tests as provided under this chapter, the person
shall only be required to submit to chemical tests of his or her breath, saliva or urine. When a person
is requested to submit to blood tests, only a physician or registered nurse, or a medical technician
certified under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of health, may withdraw
blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content in it. This limitation shall not apply to
the taking of breath, saliva or urine specimens. The person tested shall be permitted to have a
physician of his or her own choosing, and at his or her own expense, administer chemical tests of
his or her breath, blood, saliva and/or urine in addition to the tests administered at the direction of
a law enforcement officer. If a person, having been placed under arrest, refuses upon the request of
a law enforcement officer to submit to the tests, as provided in § 31-27-2, none shall be given.
(1) At the initial traffic tribunal appearance, the magistrate shall review the incident, action,
and/or arrest reports submitted by the law enforcement officer to determine if there exists
reasonable grounds to believe that the person had been driving a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of
title 21, or any combination thereof. The magistrate shall also determine if the person had been
informed of the penalties incurred as a result of failing to submit to a chemical test as provided in
this section and that the person had been informed of the implied consent notice contained in
subsection (c)(10) of this section. For the purpose of this subsection only, “driving a motor vehicle
while under the influence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21” shall be
indicated by the presence or aroma of a controlled substance on or about the person or vehicle of
the individual refusing the chemical test or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions that the
person was impaired due to their intake of a controlled substance.
(2) If the magistrate determines that subsection (b)(1) of this section has been satisfied they
shall promptly order that the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in
this state be immediately suspended. Said suspension shall be subject to the hardship provisions
LC005621 - Page 4 of 9

enumerated in § 31-27-2.8.
(c) A traffic tribunal judge or magistrate, or a district court judge or magistrate, pursuant
to the terms of subsection (d) of this section, shall order as follows:
(1) Impose, for the first violation, a fine in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) to
five hundred dollars ($500) and shall order the person to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of
public community restitution. The person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a
period of six (6) months to one year. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate shall require attendance
at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance
and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual. The traffic tribunal judge or magistrate may
prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock
system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(2) Every person convicted of a second violation within a ten-year (10) period, except with
respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; shall be
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months; shall pay a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars
($600) to one thousand dollars ($1,000); perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public
community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period
of one year to two (2) years. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment
for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a
motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing
as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
(3) Every person convicted for a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period,
except with respect to cases of refusal to submit to a blood test, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor;
and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year; fined eight hundred dollars ($800) to one
thousand dollars ($1,000); shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public community
restitution; and the person’s operator’s license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two
(2) years to five (5) years. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from
operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and
urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8. The judge or magistrate shall require alcohol or drug
treatment for the individual. Provided, that prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged
with a third or subsequent violation within a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a
judge or magistrate. At the hearing, the judge or magistrate shall review the person’s driving record,
his or her employment history, family background, and any other pertinent factors that would
indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that warrants the reinstatement of his or her
license.
LC005621 - Page 5 of 9

(4) For a second violation within a ten-year (10) period with respect to a case of a refusal
to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) to one thousand dollars
($1,000); the person shall perform sixty (60) to one hundred (100) hours of public community
restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period of two (2)
years. The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. The
sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not
equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8. Such a violation with respect
to refusal to submit to a chemical blood test shall be a civil offense.
(5) For a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period with respect to a case
of a refusal to submit to a blood test, a fine in the amount of eight hundred dollars ($800) to one
thousand dollars ($1,000); the person shall perform not less than one hundred (100) hours of public
community restitution; and the person’s driving license in this state shall be suspended for a period
of two (2) to five (5) years. The sentencing judicial officer shall prohibit that person from operating
a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8.
The judicial officer shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual. Such a violation
with respect to refusal to submit to a chemical test of blood shall be a civil offense. Provided, that
prior to the reinstatement of a license to a person charged with a third or subsequent violation within
a three-year (3) period, a hearing shall be held before a judicial officer. At the hearing, the judicial
officer shall review the person’s driving record, his or her employment history, family background,
and any other pertinent factors that would indicate that the person has demonstrated behavior that
warrants the reinstatement of their license.
(6) For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall
constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or § 31-27-2.
(7) In addition to any other fines, a highway safety assessment of five hundred dollars
($500) shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section, the assessment to be deposited
into the general fund. The assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a
violator before any other fines authorized by this section.
(8) In addition to any other fines and highway safety assessments, a two-hundred-dollar
($200) assessment shall be paid by any person found in violation of this section to support the
department of health’s chemical testing programs outlined in §§ 31-27-2(f) and 31-27-2(g), that
shall be deposited as general revenues, not restricted receipts.
(9) No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on
driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, or public community
restitution provided for under this section can be suspended.
LC005621 - Page 6 of 9

(10) Implied consent notice for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older: “Rhode Island
law requires you to submit to a chemical test of your blood, breath, saliva, or urine for the purpose
of determining the chemical content of your body fluids or breath. If you refuse this testing, certain
penalties can be imposed and include the following: for a first offense, your Rhode Island driver’s
license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state can be suspended for six (6) months to
one year or modified to permit operation in connection with an ignition interlock device and/or
blood and urine testing for a period specified by law; a fine from two hundred dollars ($200) to five
hundred dollars ($500) can be imposed; and you can be ordered to perform ten (10) to sixty (60)
hours of community service and attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the
influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment. If you have had one or more
previous offenses within the past ten (10) years, your refusal to submit to a chemical test of breath
or urine at this time can have criminal penalties, including incarceration up to six (6) months for a
second offense and up to one year for a third or subsequent offense, and can carry increased license
suspension or ignition interlock and/or blood and urine testing periods, fines, and community
service. All violators shall pay a five hundred dollar ($500) highway safety assessment fee, a two
hundred dollar ($200) department of health chemical testing programs assessment fee, and a license
reinstatement fee. Refusal to submit to a chemical test of blood shall not subject you to criminal
penalties for the refusal itself, but if you have one or more previous offenses other civil penalties
may increase. You have the right to be examined at your own expense by a physician selected by
you. If you submit to a chemical test at this time, you have the right to have an additional chemical
test performed at your own expense. You will be afforded a reasonable opportunity to exercise
these rights. Access to a telephone will be made available for you to make those arrangements. You
may now use a telephone.”
Use of this implied consent notice shall serve as evidence that a person’s consent to a
chemical test is valid in a prosecution involving driving under the influence of liquor, controlled
substances, and/or drugs.
(d) Upon suspending or refusing to issue a license or permit as provided in subsection (a),
the traffic tribunal or district court shall immediately notify the person involved in writing, and
upon his or her request, within fifteen (15) days, afford the person an opportunity for a hearing as
early as practical upon receipt of a request in writing. Upon a hearing, the judge may administer
oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books
and papers. If the judge finds after the hearing that:
(1) The law enforcement officer making the sworn report had reasonable grounds to believe
that the arrested person had been driving a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
LC005621 - Page 7 of 9

of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or
any combination of these;
(2) The person, while under arrest, refused to submit to the tests upon the request of a law
enforcement officer;
(3) The person had been informed of his or her rights in accordance with § 31-27-3; and
(4) The person had been informed of the penalties contained in the implied consent notice
set forth in subsection (c)(10) of this section, the judge shall sustain the violation. The judge shall
then impose the penalties set forth in subsection (c) of this section. Action by the judge must be
taken within seven (7) days after the hearing or it shall be presumed that the judge has refused to
issue his or her order of suspension.
(e) For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the
presence of alcohol that relies, in whole or in part, upon the principle of infrared light absorption is
considered a chemical test.
(f) If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall, for any reason,
be judged invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the section,
but shall be confined in this effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the
controversy giving rise to the judgment.
SECTION 3. Section 31-41.1-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-41.1 entitled
"Adjudication of Traffic Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-41.1-10. Expungement.
All violations within this title which are in the jurisdiction of the traffic tribunal or of a
municipal court shall by operation of law, after three (3) years, following adjudication of the
violation and after expiration of any mandatory state or federal record-retention period, be
expunged from the records of the traffic tribunal or the municipal court and from the records of the
division of motor vehicles, except for those offenses related to alcohol as provided in § 31-27-2.1,
which shall be expunged after five (5) ten (10) years. These expungements shall be in addition to
and not in place of any expungement provided for by chapter 1.3 of title 12.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005621
========
LC005621 - Page 8 of 9